src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-A-ohkíímaan_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ohkiimaana - ok : # -m animate noun, dog AEW NA1
     ohkiimaana+NA+Sg: ohkiimaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Pl: ohkiimaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Obv: ohkiimaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Non: ohkiimaani
     
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nitohkiimaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nitohkiimaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nitohkiimaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nitohkiimaani
     
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nitohkiimaannaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nitohkiimaannaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nitohkiimaannaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nitohkiimaannaani

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kitohkiimaannoona
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kitohkiimaannooniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kitohkiimaannooni
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kitohkiimaannooni

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kitohkiimaana
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kitohkiimaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kitohkiimaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kitohkiimaani

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kitohkiimaanoaawa
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kitohkiimaanoaawaiksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kitohkiimaanoaawayi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kitohkiimaanoaawai

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: otohkiimaaniksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: otohkiimaani
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Sg+Non: otohkiimaani

     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: otohkiimaanoaawaiksi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: otohkiimaanoaawayi
     ohkiimaana+NA+Px3Pl+Non: otohkiimaanoaawai
